Utah statutes.
63G-3-303.   Changes in rules.

(1) (a)  To change a proposed rule already published in the bulletin, an agency shall file with the division:

(i) the text of the changed rule; and

(ii)  a rule analysis containing a description of the change and the information required by Section 63G-3-301.

(b)  A change to a proposed rule may not be filed more than 120 days after publication of the rule being changed.

(c)  The division shall publish the rule analysis for the changed rule in the bulletin.

(d)  The changed proposed rule and its associated proposed rule will become effective on a date specified by the agency, not less than 30 days or more than 120 days after publication of the last change in proposed rule.

(e)  A changed proposed rule and its associated proposed rule lapse if a notice of effective date or another change to a proposed rule is not filed with the division within 120 days of publication of the last change in proposed rule.

(2)  If the rule change is nonsubstantive:

(a)  the agency need not comply with the requirements of Subsection (1); and

(b)  the agency shall notify the division of the change in writing.

(3)  If the rule is effective, the agency shall amend the rule according to the procedures specified in Section 63G-3-301.

